Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Public Employees Re-
tirement System, for the following purposes:
(1) Central Administration
Division..................................... $ 19,740,974
(2) Financial and Administrative
Services Division....................... $ 23,900,400
(3) Information Services Division .. $ 34,216,261
(4) Operations Division................... $ 48,877,505
(5) Compliance, Audit and Risk
Division..................................... $ 10,470,390
(6) Core Retirement System:
(a) Implementation of chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019:
(A) Project management and
implementation ......................... $ 1,876,800
(B) Quality assurance and testing .. $ 1,062,600
(C) Information technology
applications............................... $ 13,423,000
(D) Operational implementation...... $ 3,769,372
(b) ORION Modernization Project:
(A) Program staff ............................ $ 3,406,073
(B) Client relationship
management.............................. $ 1,255,000
(C) Data and analytics .................... $ 1,300,000
(D) Development and operations..... $ 1,102,000
(E) Architecture.............................. $ 950,000
(F) Independent quality
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 1
management services................ $ 950,000
(G) Hybrid integration platform...... $ 400,000
(H) Telephony.................................. $ 210,000
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$21,217,388 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Public Employees Retirement System for the Employer In-
centive Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from fees,  moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, by the Public Employees Retirement System from
the Employer Incentive Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses by the Public Employees Retirement System from the School Districts Unfunded
Liability Fund.
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Public Em-
ployees Retirement System for refunds, retirement benefits,  deferred compensation and in-
dividual account program payments, health insurance premiums, health insurance premium
subsidies, third party administrator costs for health and individual  account programs and
Public Employee Benefit Equalization Fund payments are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 1, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 2